Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 1
SOUTHERN STATES ENERGY COMPACT

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1979, p. 806 changed the name of the Southern Interstate Nuclear Compact to the Southern States Energy Compact and made several other changes in the text of the Compact and in this article. Ga. L. 1979, p. 806,

§

9 provided that the provisions of Ga. L. 1979, p. 806,

§

9 were to become effective "at such time as nine of the party states to the Southern Interstate Nuclear Compact approve substantially the same changes in the Compact as are provided for in this Act and the Congress of the United States consents to the Compact, substantially as amended by this Act." Subsequently, the Compact received the approval of the requisite number of states and by the Congress of the United States; thus, the Act is now binding.

12-10-1. Compact enacted and entered into by State of Georgia; text of compact.

The Southern States Energy Compact is enacted into law and entered into by the State of Georgia with any and all states legally joining therein in accordance with its terms. The compact is substantially as follows:
'

'ARTICLE I. POLICY AND PURPOSE.

The party states recognize that the proper employment and conservation of energy and employment of energy-related facilities, materials, and products, within the context of a responsible regard for the environment, can assist substantially in the industrialization of the South and the development of a balanced economy for the region. They also recognize that optimum benefit from and acquisition of energy resources and facilities require systematic encouragements, guidance, and assistance from the party states on a cooperative basis. It is the policy of the party states to undertake such cooperation on a continuing basis; it is the purpose of this compact to provide the instruments and framework for such a cooperative effort to improve the economy of the South and contribute to the individual and community well-being of the region's people.

12-10-2. Appointment of representatives to Southern States Energy Board; compensation.

The Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each appoint a representative from this state to the Southern States Energy Board which is established by Article II of the compact. Each such representative shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing officer. The Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives are each authorized to appoint an alternate representative who may serve at and for such time as the regular representative shall designate and who shall have the same power and authority as the regular representative when so serving. The representative appointed by the Lieutenant Governor shall be a member of the Senate, and the representative appointed by the Speaker shall be a member of the House of Representatives.

Each person appointed to represent this state on the Southern States Energy Board shall be entitled to receive the same per diem, travel expenses, and allowances for each day of service on the Southern States Energy Board as are authorized by law for members of the General Assembly. Such expenses and allowances for members of the General Assembly serving on the Southern States Energy Board shall be paid from funds appropriated to the legislative branch of government. The person representing the Governor, if a state officer or employee, shall receive such expenses and allowances out of funds appropriated to or otherwise available to the agency by which he is employed or, if he is not a state officer or employee, out of funds appropriated or otherwise available to the executive office of the Governor.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 505, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 806, § 8.)

12-10-3. Board employees under merit system; establishment of retirement system.

The employees of the Southern States Energy Board shall be under such merit system as the Southern States Energy Board shall provide and, for the purposes of carrying out Article II(f), the Southern States Energy Board and its employees shall be considered a state agency. The Employees' Retirement System of Georgia is authorized to contract with the Southern States Energy Board in order to further or facilitate the activities of the Southern States Energy Board pursuant to Article II(f) of the compact. No such contract shall take effect prior to its approval by the Governor.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 505, § 3.)

12-10-4. Board considered state agency for purpose of obtaining personnel services.

For the purposes of facilitating Article II(g) of the compact, the Southern States Energy Board shall be considered a state agency.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 505, § 4.)

12-10-5. Budget of estimated expenditures to be submitted to Governor.

Pursuant to Article III(a) of the compact, the Southern States Energy Board shall submit its budgets of estimated expenditures to the Governor for presentation to the General Assembly.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 505, § 5.)

12-10-6. Appropriations for supplementary agreements.

Any supplementary agreement entered into pursuant to Article VI of the compact and requiring the expenditure of funds or the assumption of an obligation to expend funds in addition to those already appropriated shall not become effective as to this state prior to the making of an appropriation by the General Assembly therefor.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 505, § 6.)

12-10-7. Cooperation by state departments, agencies, officers, and subdivisions with Board.

The departments, agencies, and officers of this state and its subdivisions are authorized to cooperate with the Southern States Energy Board in the furtherance of any of its activities pursuant to the compact.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 505, § 7.)

12-10-8. Appropriation of funds to carry out article and compact.

The funds necessary to carry out this article and the compact shall be paid from funds appropriated to or otherwise made available to the executive branch of the state government.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 505, § 8; Ga. L. 1968, p. 475, § 1.)